Virginia statutes. Title 63.2. Welfare (Social Services).
Article 1. General Provisions.
§ 63.2-1709.
Enforcement and sanctions; assisted living facilities and adult day care centers; interim administration; receivership, revocation, denial, summary suspension.

Upon receipt and verification by the Commissioner of information from any source indicating an imminent and substantial risk of harm to residents, the Commissioner may require an assisted living facility to contract with an individual licensed by the Board of Long-Term Care Administrators, to be either selected from a list created and maintained by the Department of Medical Assistance Services or selected from a pool of appropriately licensed administrators recommended by the owner of the assisted living facility, to administer, manage, or operate the assisted living facility on an interim basis, and to attempt to bring the facility into compliance with all relevant requirements of law, regulation, or any plan of correction approved by the Commissioner. Such contract shall require the interim administrator to comply with any and all requirements established by the Department to ensure the health, safety, and welfare of the residents. Prior to or upon conclusion of the period of interim administration, management, or operation, an inspection shall be conducted to determine whether operation of the assisted living facility shall be permitted to continue or should cease. Such interim administration, management, or operation shall not be permitted when defects in the conditions of the premises of the assisted living facility (i) present immediate and substantial risks to the health, safety, and welfare of residents, and (ii) may not be corrected within a reasonable period of time. Any decision by the Commissioner to require the employment of a person to administer, manage, or operate an assisted living facility shall be subject to the rights of judicial review and appeal as provided in the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.). Actual and reasonable costs of such interim administration shall be the responsibility of and shall be borne by the owner of the assisted living facility.

The Board shall adopt regulations for the Commissioner to use in determining when the imposition of administrative sanctions or initiation of court proceedings, severally or jointly, is appropriate in order to ensure prompt correction of violations in assisted living facilities and adult day care centers involving noncompliance with state law or regulation as discovered through any inspection or investigation conducted by the Departments of Social Services, Health, or Behavioral Health and Developmental Services. The Commissioner may impose such sanctions or take such actions as are appropriate for violation of any of the provisions of this subtitle or any regulation adopted under any provision of this subtitle that adversely affects the health, safety or welfare of an assisted living facility resident or an adult day care participant. Such sanctions or actions may include (i) petitioning the court to appoint a receiver for any assisted living facility or adult day care center and (ii) revoking or denying renewal of the license for the assisted living facility or adult day care center for violation of any of the provisions of this subtitle, §

54.1-3408

or any regulation adopted under this subtitle that violation adversely affects, or is an immediate and substantial threat to, the health, safety or welfare of the person cared for therein, or for permitting, aiding or abetting the commission of any illegal act in an assisted living facility or adult day care center.

The Commissioner may issue a notice of summary suspension of the license to operate the assisted living facility pursuant to (i) for assisted living facilities operated by agencies of the Commonwealth, the procedures set forth in §

63.2-1710.1

or (ii) for all other assisted living facilities, the procedures hereinafter set forth in conjunction with any proceeding for revocation, denial, or other action when conditions or practices exist that pose an immediate and substantial threat to the health, safety, and welfare of the residents. The notice of summary suspension shall set forth (a) the summary suspension procedures, (b) hearing and appeal rights as provided under this subsection, (c) facts and evidence that formed the basis for which the summary suspension is sought, and (d) the time, date, and location of the hearing to determine whether the suspension is appropriate. Such notice shall be served on the assisted living facility or its designee as soon as practicable thereafter by personal service or certified mail, return receipt requested, to the address of record of the assisted living facility.The summary suspension hearing shall be presided over by a hearing officer selected by the Commissioner from a list prepared by the Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court of Virginia and shall be held as soon as practicable, but in no event later than 15 business days following service of the notice of hearing; however, the hearing officer may grant a written request for a continuance, not to exceed an additional 10 business days, for good cause shown. Within 10 business days after such hearing, the hearing officer shall provide to the Commissioner written findings and conclusions, together with a recommendation as to whether the license should be summarily suspended.Within 10 business days of the receipt of the hearing officer’s findings, conclusions, and recommendation, the Commissioner may issue a final order of summary suspension or an order that such summary suspension is not warranted by the facts and circumstances presented. The Commissioner shall adopt the hearing officer’s recommended decision unless to do so would be an error of law or Department policy. In the event that the Commissioner rejects a hearing officer’s findings, conclusions, or recommended decision, the Commissioner shall state with particularity the basis for rejection. In issuing a final order of summary suspension, the Commissioner may suspend the license of the assisted living facility or suspend only certain authority of the assisted living facility to provide certain services or perform certain functions that the Commissioner determines should be restricted or modified in order to protect the health, safety, and welfare of the residents receiving care. A final order of summary suspension shall include notice that the assisted living facility may appeal the Commissioner’s decision to the appropriate circuit court no later than 10 days following service of the order. A copy of any final order of summary suspension shall be prominently displayed by the provider at each public entrance of the facility, or in lieu thereof, the provider may display a written statement summarizing the terms of the order in a prominent location, printed in a clear and legible size and typeface, and identifying the location within the facility where the final order of summary suspension may be reviewed.Upon appeal, the sole issue before the court shall be whether the Department had reasonable grounds to require the assisted living facility to cease operations during the pendency of the concurrent revocation, denial, or other proceeding. Any concurrent revocation, denial, or other proceeding shall not be affected by the outcome of any hearing on the appropriateness of the summary suspension. The willful and material failure to comply with the final order of summary suspension shall constitute an offense under subdivision 3 of §

63.2-1712

. At the request of the Commissioner, all agencies and subdivisions of the Commonwealth shall cooperate with the Commissioner in the relocation of residents of an assisted living facility whose license has been summarily suspended pursuant to this section and in any other actions necessary to reduce the risk of further harm to residents.

Notice of the Commissioner’s intent to revoke or deny renewal of the license for an assisted living facility or to summarily suspend the license of an assisted living facility shall be provided by the Department and a copy of such notice shall be posted in a prominent place at each public entrance of the licensed premises to advise consumers of serious or persistent violations. In determining whether to deny, revoke, or summarily suspend a license, the Commissioner may choose to deny, revoke, or summarily suspend only certain authority of the assisted living facility to operate and may restrict or modify the assisted living facility’s authority to provide certain services or perform certain functions that the Commissioner determines should be restricted or modified in order to protect the health, safety, or welfare of the residents. Such proposed denial, revocation, or summary suspension of certain services or functions may be appealed (i) if the assisted living facility is operated by an agency of the Commonwealth in accordance with the provisions of §

63.2-1710.2

and (ii) for all other assisted living facilities as otherwise provided in this subtitle for any denial, revocation, or summary suspension.

History.

Code 1950, § 63-249; 1968, c. 578, § 63.1-212; 1991, c. 532, § 63.1-179.1; 1992, c. 356, § 63.1-194.9; 1993, cc. 730, 742, 957, 993, § 63.1-211.3; 1998, cc. 115, 397, 850; 2002, c. 747; 2005, cc. 610, 924; 2009, cc. 813, 840; 2018, c. 274; 2019, c. 449.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, cc. 610 and 924, which rewrote the section, in cl. 5 provides: “That the Board of Long-Term Care Administrators shall convene a task force to develop licensing regulations for assisted living facility administrators and submit an initial progress report by November 1, 2005, and a follow-up progress report by November 1, 2006, on such regulations to the chairmen of the Joint Commission on Health Care, the House Committee on Health, Welfare and Institutions, and the Senate Committee on Rehabilitation and Social Services.”

Acts 2005, cc. 610 and 924, cl. 6 provides: “That the Board of Long-Term Care Administrators shall adopt final regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective on or before July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2005, cc. 610 and 924, cl. 8 provides: “That the State Board of Social Services shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.”

Acts 2005, cc. 610 and 924, cl. 10 provides: “That the Department of Social Services shall develop a training module on assisted living facilities, including all applicable statutes and regulations, that shall be used to train all adult care licensing inspectors currently employed by the Department no later than October 1, 2005. Any person subsequently employed as an adult care inspector shall receive such training no later than 60 days following the commencement of employment.”

Acts 2005, cc. 610 and 924, cl. 11 provides: “That the Department of Social Services shall seek consultation and information from all relevant agencies of government in its development of regulations and policies to implement the provisions of the act. The Department of Social Services shall integrate into the regulations and policies standards that are consistent with the recommendations of the Department of Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services [now Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services] necessary to ensure appropriate care for residents with mental illness, mental retardation, substance abuse, and other behavioral disabilities. The Department of Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services [now Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services] shall cooperate fully in the development of these standards.”

Acts 2005, cc. 610 and 924, cl. 12 provides: “That the Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court and the Department of Social Services shall establish a protocol for the expedited appointment of a hearing officer to comply with subsection C of §

63.2-1709

.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendments by cc. 610 and 924 are identical, and rewrote the section.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 813 and 840 are identical, and substituted “Behavioral Health and Developmental Services” for “Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services” at the end of the first sentence of subsection B.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 274, in the first paragraph of subsection C, inserted “(i) for assisted living facilities operated by agencies of the Commonwealth, the procedures set forth in §

63.2-1710.1

or (ii) for all other assisted living facilities,” redesignated former clauses (i) through (iii) as clauses (a) through (c) and redesignated former clauses (a) and (b) as clauses (1) and (2); in subsection D, substituted “an assisted living facility or to summarily suspend the license of an assisted living facility” for “the assisted living facility” in the first sentence, and inserted “proposed” and “(i) if the assisted living facility is operated by an agency of the Commonwealth, in accordance with the provisions of §

63.2-1710.2

and (ii) for all other assisted living facilities” in the last sentence.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 449 substituted “immediate” for “imminent” throughout; and rewrote subsection C.

§ 63.2-1709.1.
Enforcement and sanctions; child welfare agencies; revocation, denial, and summary suspension.

The Commissioner may revoke or deny the renewal of the license of any child welfare agency that violates any provision of this subtitle or fails to comply with the limitations and standards set forth in its license.

Pursuant to the procedures set forth in subsection C and in addition to the authority for other disciplinary actions provided in this title, the Commissioner may issue a notice of summary suspension of the license of any child welfare agency, in conjunction with any proceeding for revocation, denial, or other action, when conditions or practices exist in the child welfare agency that pose an immediate and substantial threat to the health, safety, and welfare of the children receiving care and the Commissioner believes the operation of the child welfare agency should be suspended during the pendency of such proceeding.

A notice of summary suspension issued by the Commissioner to a child welfare agency shall set forth (i) the summary suspension procedures; (ii) hearing and appeal rights as provided in this subsection; (iii) facts and evidence that formed the basis for the summary suspension; and (iv) the time, date, and location of a hearing to determine whether the summary suspension is appropriate. Such notice shall be served on the child welfare agency or its designee as soon as practicable thereafter by personal service or certified mail, return receipt requested, to the address of record of the child welfare agency.The summary suspension hearing shall be presided over by a hearing officer selected by the Commissioner from a list prepared by the Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court of Virginia and shall be held as soon as practicable, but in no event later than 15 business days following service of the notice of summary suspension; however, the hearing officer may grant a written request for a continuance, not to exceed an additional 10 business days, for good cause shown. Within 10 business days after such hearing, the hearing officer shall provide to the Commissioner written findings and conclusions, together with a recommendation as to whether the license should be summarily suspended.Within 10 business days of the receipt of the hearing officer’s findings, conclusions, and recommendation, the Commissioner may issue a final order of summary suspension or an order that such summary suspension is not warranted by the facts and circumstances presented. The Commissioner shall adopt the hearing officer’s recommended decision unless to do so would be an error of law or Department policy. In the event that the Commissioner rejects the hearing officer’s findings, conclusions, or recommendation, the Commissioner shall state with particularity the basis for rejection. In issuing a final order of summary suspension, the Commissioner may choose to suspend the license of the child welfare agency or to suspend only certain authority of the child welfare agency to operate, including the authority to provide certain services or perform certain functions that the Commissioner determines should be restricted or modified in order to protect the health, safety, or welfare of the children receiving care. A final order of summary suspension shall include notice that the licensee may appeal the Commissioner’s decision to the appropriate circuit court no later than 10 days following service of the order. The sole issue before the court shall be whether the Commissioner had reasonable grounds to require the licensee to cease operations during the pendency of the concurrent revocation, denial, or other proceeding. The concurrent revocation, denial, or other proceeding shall not be affected by the outcome of any hearing on the appropriateness of the summary suspension.A copy of any final order of summary suspension shall be prominently displayed by the child welfare agency at each public entrance of the facility, or in lieu thereof, the child welfare agency may display a written statement summarizing the terms of the order in a prominent location, printed in a clear and legible size and typeface, and identifying the location within the facility where the final order of summary suspension may be reviewed.The willful and material failure to comply with the final order of summary suspension constitutes a violation of subdivision 3 of §

63.2-1712

. In the case of a children’s residential facility, the Commissioner may require the cooperation of any other agency or subdivision of the Commonwealth in the relocation of children who are residents of a children’s residential facility whose license has been summarily suspended pursuant to this section and in any other actions necessary to reduce the risk of further harm to such residents.The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to any child welfare agency operated by an agency of the Commonwealth, which shall instead be governed by the provisions of §

63.2-1710.1

.

History.

2005, cc. 610, 924; 2019, c. 449.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, cc. 610 and 924, cl. 5 provides: “That the Board of Long-Term Care Administrators shall convene a task force to develop licensing regulations for assisted living facility administrators and submit an initial progress report by November 1, 2005, and a follow-up progress report by November 1, 2006, on such regulations to the chairmen of the Joint Commission on Health Care, the House Committee on Health, Welfare and Institutions, and the Senate Committee on Rehabilitation and Social Services.”

Acts 2005, cc. 610 and 924, cl. 6 provides: “That the Board of Long-Term Care Administrators shall adopt final regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective on or before July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2005, cc. 610 and 924, cl. 8 provides: “That the State Board of Social Services shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.”

Acts 2005, cc. 610 and 924, cl. 10 provides: “That the Department of Social Services shall develop a training module on assisted living facilities, including all applicable statutes and regulations, that shall be used to train all adult care licensing inspectors currently employed by the Department no later than October 1, 2005. Any person subsequently employed as an adult care inspector shall receive such training no later than 60 days following the commencement of employment.”

Acts 2005, cc. 610 and 924, cl. 11 provides: “That the Department of Social Services shall seek consultation and information from all relevant agencies of government in its development of regulations and policies to implement the provisions of the act. The Department of Social Services shall integrate into the regulations and policies standards that are consistent with the recommendations of the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services necessary to ensure appropriate care for residents with mental illness, mental retardation, substance abuse, and other behavioral disabilities. The Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services shall cooperate fully in the development of these standards.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 449 designated the existing provisions as subsection A; and added subsections B and C.

§ 63.2-1709.2.
Enforcement and sanctions; special orders; civil penalties.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, following a proceeding as provided in §

2.2-4019

, the Commissioner may issue a special order (i) for violation of any of the provisions of this subtitle, §

54.1-3408

, or any regulation adopted under any provision of this subtitle which violation adversely affects, or is an imminent and substantial threat to, the health, safety, or welfare of the person cared for therein, or (ii) for permitting, aiding, or abetting the commission of any illegal act in an assisted living facility, adult day care center, or child welfare agency. Notice of the Commissioner’s intent to take any of the actions enumerated in subdivisions B 1 through B 7 shall be provided by the Department and a copy of such notice shall be posted in a prominent place at each public entrance of the licensed premises to advise consumers of serious or persistent violations. The issuance of a special order shall be considered a case decision as defined in §

2.2-4001

. Actions set forth in subsection B may be appealed by (a) an assisted living facility, adult day care center, or child welfare agency operated by an agency of the Commonwealth in accordance with §

63.2-1710.2

or (b) any other assisted living facility, adult day care center, or child welfare agency in accordance with the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.). The Commissioner shall not delegate his authority to impose civil penalties in conjunction with the issuance of special orders.

The Commissioner may take the following actions regarding assisted living facilities, adult day care centers, and child welfare agencies through the issuance of a special order and may require a copy of the special order provided by the Department to be posted in a prominent place at each public entrance of the licensed premises to advise consumers of serious or persistent violations:

Place a licensee on probation upon finding that the licensee is substantially out of compliance with the terms of its license and that the health and safety of residents, participants, or children are at risk;

Reduce licensed capacity or prohibit new admissions when the Commissioner concludes that the licensee cannot make necessary corrections to achieve compliance with regulations except by a temporary restriction of its scope of service;

Mandate training for the licensee or licensee’s employees, with any costs to be borne by the licensee, when the Commissioner concludes that the lack of such training has led directly to violations of regulations;

Assess civil penalties for each day the assisted living facility is or was out of compliance with the terms of its license and the health, safety, and welfare of residents are at risk, which shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Assisted Living Facility Education, Training, and Technical Assistance Fund created pursuant to §

63.2-1803.1

; however, no civil penalty shall be imposed pursuant to this subdivision on any assisted living facility operated by an agency of the Commonwealth. The aggregate amount of such civil penalties shall not exceed $10,000 for assisted living facilities in any 12-month period. Criteria for imposition of civil penalties and amounts, expressed in ranges, shall be developed by the Board, and shall be based upon the severity, pervasiveness, duration, and degree of risk to the health, safety, or welfare of residents. Such civil penalties shall be applied by the Commissioner in a consistent manner. Such criteria shall also provide that (i) the Commissioner may accept a plan of correction, including a schedule of compliance, from an assisted living facility prior to setting a civil penalty, and (ii) the Commissioner may reduce or abate the penalty amount if the facility complies with the plan of correction within its terms.A single act, omission, or incident shall not give rise to imposition of multiple civil penalties even though such act, omission, or incident may violate more than one statute or regulation. A civil penalty that is not appealed becomes due on the first day after the appeal period expires. The license of an assisted living facility that has failed to pay a civil penalty due under this section shall not be renewed until the civil penalty has been paid in full, with interest, provided that the Commissioner may renew a license when an unpaid civil penalty is the subject of a pending appeal;

Assess civil penalties of not more than $500 per inspection upon finding that the adult day care center or child welfare agency is substantially out of compliance with the terms of its license and the health and safety of residents, participants, or children are at risk; however, no civil penalty shall be imposed pursuant to this subdivision on any adult day care center or child welfare agency operated by an agency of the Commonwealth;

Require licensees to contact parents, guardians, or other responsible persons in writing regarding health and safety violations; and

Prevent licensees who are substantially out of compliance with the licensure terms or in violation of the regulations from receiving public funds.

The Board shall adopt regulations to implement the provisions of this section.

History.

2005, cc. 610, 924; 2017, cc. 138, 283; 2018, c. 274.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, cc. 610 and 924, cl. 5 provides: “That the Board of Long-Term Care Administrators shall convene a task force to develop licensing regulations for assisted living facility administrators and submit an initial progress report by November 1, 2005, and a follow-up progress report by November 1, 2006, on such regulations to the chairmen of the Joint Commission on Health Care, the House Committee on Health, Welfare and Institutions, and the Senate Committee on Rehabilitation and Social Services.”

Acts 2005, cc. 610 and 924, cl. 6 provides: “That the Board of Long-Term Care Administrators shall adopt final regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective on or before July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2005, cc. 610 and 924, cl. 8 provides: “That the State Board of Social Services shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.”

Acts 2005, cc. 610 and 924, cl. 10 provides: “That the Department of Social Services shall develop a training module on assisted living facilities, including all applicable statutes and regulations, that shall be used to train all adult care licensing inspectors currently employed by the Department no later than October 1, 2005. Any person subsequently employed as an adult care inspector shall receive such training no later than 60 days following the commencement of employment.”

Acts 2005, cc. 610 and 924, cl. 11 provides: “That the Department of Social Services shall seek consultation and information from all relevant agencies of government in its development of regulations and policies to implement the provisions of the act. The Department of Social Services shall integrate into the regulations and policies standards that are consistent with the recommendations of the Department of Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services [now Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services] necessary to ensure appropriate care for residents with mental illness, mental retardation, substance abuse, and other behavioral disabilities. The Department of Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services [now Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services] shall cooperate fully in the development of these standards.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendments by cc. 138 and 283 are identical, and substituted “12-month” for “24-month” in the second sentence of subdivision B 4.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 274 added the fourth sentence in subsection A; in subdivision B 4, inserted “however, no civil penalty shall be imposed pursuant to this subdivision on any assisted living facility operated by an agency of the Commonwealth”; and in subdivision B 5, inserted “however, no civil penalty shall be imposed pursuant to this subdivision on any adult day care center or child welfare agency operated by an agency of the Commonwealth.”

§ 63.2-1709.3.
Child-placing agencies; conscience clause.

To the extent allowed by federal law, no private child-placing agency shall be required to perform, assist, counsel, recommend, consent to, refer, or participate in any placement of a child for foster care or adoption when the proposed placement would violate the agency’s written religious or moral convictions or policies.

The Commissioner shall not deny an application for an initial license or renewal of a license or revoke the license of a private child-placing agency because of the agency’s objection to performing, assisting, counseling, recommending, consenting to, referring, or participating in a placement that violates the agency’s written religious or moral convictions or policies.

A state or local government entity may not deny a private child-placing agency any grant, contract, or participation in a government program because of the agency’s objection to performing, assisting, counseling, recommending, consenting to, referring, or participating in a placement that violates the agency’s written religious or moral convictions or policies.

Refusal of a private child-placing agency to perform, assist, counsel, recommend, consent to, refer, or participate in a placement that violates the agency’s written religious or moral convictions or policies shall not form the basis of any claim for damages.

History.

2012, cc. 690, 715.

§ 63.2-1710.
Appeal from refusal, denial of renewal, or revocation of license.

Whenever the Commissioner refuses to issue a license or to renew a license or revokes a license for an assisted living facility, adult day care center, or child welfare agency operated by an agency of the Commonwealth, the provisions of §

63.2-1710.2

shall apply. Whenever the Commissioner refuses to issue a license or to renew a license or revokes a license for an assisted living facility, adult day care center, or child welfare agency other than an assisted living facility, adult day care center, or child welfare agency operated by an agency of the Commonwealth, the provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) shall apply, except that all appeals from notice of the Commissioner’s intent to refuse to issue or renew, or revoke a license shall be received in writing from the assisted living facility, adult day care center or child welfare agency operator within 15 days of the date of receipt of the notice. Judicial review of a final review agency decision shall be in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Process Act. No stay may be granted upon appeal to the Court of Appeals.

In every appeal to a court of record, the Commissioner shall be named defendant.

An appeal, taken as provided in this section, shall operate to stay any criminal prosecution for operation without a license.

When issuance or renewal of a license as an assisted living facility or adult day care center has been refused by the Commissioner, the applicant shall not thereafter for a period of one year apply again for such license unless the Commissioner in his sole discretion believes that there has been such a change in the conditions on account of which he refused the prior application as to justify considering the new application. When an appeal is taken by the applicant pursuant to subsection A, the one-year period shall be extended until a final decision has been rendered on appeal.

When issuance or renewal of a license for a child welfare agency has been refused by the Commissioner, the applicant shall not thereafter for a period of six months apply again for such license unless the Commissioner in his sole discretion believes that there has been such a change in the conditions on account of which he refused the prior application as to justify considering the new application. When an appeal is taken by the applicant pursuant to subsection A, the six-month period shall be extended until a final decision has been rendered on appeal.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 63-224.3, 63-250; 1954, c. 259; 1968, c. 578, §§ 63.1-180, 63.1-213; 1973, c. 227; 1975, c. 539; 1986, c. 615; 1991, c. 532; 1992, c. 356, § 63.1-194.10; 1993, cc. 957, 993; 1998, c. 850; 2002, c. 747; 2018, c. 274; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 3 provides: “That any case for which a notice of appeal to the Supreme Court has been filed prior to January 1, 2022, shall continue in the Supreme Court of Virginia and shall not be affected by the provisions of this act.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 4 provides: “That any case for which a petition for appeal in a criminal case to the Court of Appeals has been filed prior to January 1, 2022, and a decision on such petition remains pending, such petition for appeal shall be deemed granted and the clerk of the Court of Appeals shall certify the granting of such petition to the trial court and all counsel. Such case shall be considered mature for purposes of further proceedings from the date of such certificate.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 6 provides: “That the provisions of this act amending
§

17.1-400

of the Code of Virginia shall become effective in due course and that the remaining provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022.”

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 274 inserted “operated by an agency of the Commonwealth, the provisions of §

63.2-1710.2

shall apply. Whenever the Commissioner refuses to issue a license or to renew a license or revokes a license for an assisted living facility, adult day care center, or child welfare agency other than an assisted living facility, adult day care center, or child welfare agency operated by an agency of the Commonwealth” in subsection A.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, effective January 1, 2022, in subsection A, substituted “Court of Appeals” for “Virginia Supreme Court” and made a stylistic change.

§ 63.2-1710.1.
Summary order of suspension; assisted living facilities and child welfare agencies operated by an agency of the Commonwealth.

Whenever the Commissioner issues a summary order of suspension of the license to operate an assisted living facility, group home, or child welfare agency operated by an agency of the Commonwealth:

Before such summary order of suspension shall take effect, the Commissioner shall issue to the assisted living facility, group home, or child welfare agency a notice of summary order of suspension setting forth (i) the procedures for a hearing and right of review as provided in this section and (ii) facts and evidence that formed the basis on which the summary order of suspension is sought. Such notice shall be served on the licensee or its designee as soon as practicable thereafter by personal service or certified mail, return receipt requested, to the address of record of the licensee. The notice shall state the time, date, and location of a hearing to determine whether the suspension is appropriate. Such hearing shall be held no later than three business days after the issuance of the notice of the summary order of suspension and shall be convened by the Commissioner or his designee. After such hearing, the Commissioner may issue a final order of summary suspension or may find that such summary suspension is not warranted by the facts and circumstances presented.

A final order of summary suspension shall include notice that the licensee may request, in writing and within three business days after receiving the Commissioner’s decision, that the Commissioner refer the matter to the Secretary of Health and Human Resources for resolution within three business days of the referral. Any determination by the Secretary shall be final and not subject to judicial review. If the final order of summary suspension is upheld, it shall take effect immediately, and a copy of the final order of summary suspension shall be prominently displayed by the licensee at each public entrance of the facility. Any concurrent revocation, denial, or other proceedings shall not be affected by the outcome of any determination by the Secretary.

History.

2018, c. 274; 2019, c. 449.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 449 substituted “child welfare agency” for “children’s residential facility” twice.

§ 63.2-1710.2.
Right to appeal notice of intent; assisted living facilities, adult day care centers, and child welfare agencies operated by agencies of the Commonwealth.

An assisted living facility, adult day care center, or child welfare agency operated by an agency of the Commonwealth shall have the right to appeal any notice of intent as follows:

Within 30 days after receiving a notice of intent to impose a sanction, the licensee shall request in writing that the Commissioner review the intended agency action and may submit, together with such request, relevant information, documentation, or other pertinent data supporting its appeal. The Commissioner shall issue a decision within 60 days after receiving the request and shall have the authority to uphold the sanction or take whatever action he deems appropriate to resolve the controversy.

If the assisted living facility, adult day care center, or child welfare agency disputes the Commissioner’s decision, the licensee shall request, within 30 days of receiving the Commissioner’s decision, that the Commissioner refer the matter to the Secretary of Health and Human Resources. The Secretary shall issue a decision within 60 days of receiving the request for review. The Secretary’s decision shall be final and shall not be subject to review.

History.

2018, c. 274.

§ 63.2-1711.
Injunction against operation without license.

Any circuit court having jurisdiction in the county or city where the principal office of any assisted living facility, adult day care center or child welfare agency is located shall, at the suit of the Commissioner, have jurisdiction to enjoin its operation without a license required by this subtitle.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 63-224.2, 63-251; 1954, c. 259; 1968, c. 578, §§ 63.1-181, 63.1-214; 1973, c. 227; 1992, c. 356, § 63.1-194.11; 1993, cc. 957, 993; 2002, c. 747.